Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5978.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 91A chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “$15,000”, in line 27, the
following words:- from the date of retirement until 10 years following the date of retirement and
$75,000 for more than 10 years following the date of retirement until 20 years following the date
of retirement.
SECTION 2. Said section 91A of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “therefor”, in lines 30 and 31, the following words:- ;
provided, that no such cap shall apply if more than 20 years have passed since the date of
retirement.
of 1